Hawaii statutes.
§844D-62 Procedures for the collection and
forwarding of samples. (a) The department of the attorney general shall
provide all blood specimen collectors, buccal swab sample collectors, mailing
envelopes, labels, and instructions for the collection of the blood specimens,
buccal swab samples, and print impressions. The specimens, samples, and print
impressions shall thereafter be forwarded to the department.

(b) Whenever withdrawal of blood is required
by this chapter or by the collecting agency's rules or internal regulations,
the withdrawal of blood shall be performed in a medically approved manner.
Only health care providers trained and certified to draw blood may withdraw the
blood specimens for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Buccal swab samples may be procured by law
enforcement or corrections personnel or other individuals trained to assist in
buccal swab collection.

(d) Print impressions taken at the time of the
collection of samples or specimens shall be placed on the samples and specimens
container and forms as directed by the department. The samples, specimens, and
forms shall be forwarded to and maintained by the department.

(e) The law enforcement or custodial agency
collecting specimens, samples, or print impressions is responsible for
confirming that the person qualifies for entry into the state DNA database and
data bank identification program prior to collecting the specimens, samples, or
print impressions pursuant to this chapter.

(f) The department is responsible for establishing
procedures for entering data bank and database information. [L 2005, c 112, pt
of §1; am L 2006, c 144, §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next